District of Columbia statutes.
5-545.06

Delegation of powers and functions.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia and the Secretary of the Interior are hereby authorized to delegate, from time to time, to their designated agent or agents, any power or function vested in them by §§ 5-541.01 to 5-545.06, except those powers and functions vested in them by §§ 5-543.05 and 5-545.04.

Aug. 1, 1958, 72 Stat. 486, Pub. L. 85-584, title V, § 506
Oct. 15, 2010, 124 Stat. 3033, Pub. L. 111-282, § 4(b)(2)(H)
1981 Ed., § 4-420.
1973 Ed., § 4-837.
Pub. L. 111-282 deleted “, the Secretary of the Treasury,” following “Columbia”.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.